Louisiana, session 2026, HB42.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:927(B)(2)(c)(i) and (d) and (F)(2) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 11:791 and 927(B)(2)(b)(iii) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§791. Phased retirement program
A. Any member of this system who qualifies for phased retirement pursuant
to the policy governing his public postsecondary education institution and who has
been approved for participation in a phased retirement program in accordance with
such policy shall apply for retirement as otherwise provided in this Chapter.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 42 ENROLLED
B. For the duration of his participation in the employer's phased retirement
program, the participant shall receive a reduced retirement benefit. This reduced
retirement benefit shall be based on the full regular benefit amount for which he
would have been eligible at the commencement of his participation in the employer's
phased retirement program, reduced by the percentage of work effort to be
performed by the participant as set forth in the approved documents governing his
participation in his employer's phased retirement program. Upon completion of
participation in the employer's phased retirement program, the participant shall begin
receiving his full regular retirement benefit.
C. During the time that a participant receives a benefit pursuant to this
Section, the participant and the employer shall not pay contributions to the defined
benefit plan, and the participant's benefit, average compensation, and creditable
service shall remain fixed as they existed on the date of commencement of
participation in his employer's phased retirement program.
D. The employer of any participant in a phased retirement program shall
notify the system of the terms of the participant's phased retirement, including the
start date, length of the phased retirement, final termination date, and percentage of
work effort to be performed by the participant. The employer and participant shall
notify the system upon the completion or termination of the phased retirement
program.
* * *
§927. Contributions
* * *
B.(1)
* * *
(2)(a)
* * *
(b) Beginning July 1, 2018, each constitutionally established board which
manages public postsecondary education institutions and each employer institution
and agency under its supervision and control shall contribute to the Teachers'
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 42 ENROLLED
Retirement System of Louisiana on behalf of each participant in the optional
retirement plan the sum of:
* * *
(iii) Beginning July 1, 2026, an amount equal to one and eight-tenths percent
of pay, subject to appropriation. The Board of Regents shall notify the Teacher's
Retirement System of Louisiana whether or not funds have been appropriated for this
purpose by the beginning of each fiscal year.
(c)(i) Each board may establish by resolution an amount in excess of the sum
of the amounts required by Items (b)(ii) and (iii) minimum required by Item (b)(ii)
of this Paragraph. The amount established shall be the same for all employer
institutions and agencies under each board's supervision and control and shall be
effective for an entire fiscal year.
* * *
(d) Upon receipt of this contribution, the Teachers' Retirement System of
Louisiana shall promptly pay over to the appropriate designated company or
companies an amount equal to the amount established by the applicable board
pursuant to Subparagraph (c) of this Paragraph or the sum of the amounts required
by Items (b)(ii) and (iii) minimum required by Item (b)(ii) of this Paragraph,
whichever is greater.
* * *
F.
* * *
(2)(a) The employer's share of the monthly fee shall be the balance
remaining after payment of the participant's share.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection,
beginning July 1, 2027, the employer shall pay the full amount of the monthly fee.
Section 2. R.S. 17:3357 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3357. Phased retirement program
A. Each public postsecondary education management board may develop
and implement a phased retirement program, referred to in this Section as a
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 42 ENROLLED
"program", for institutions under its management and supervision for the purpose of
supporting faculty and staff recruitment and retention, facilitating institutional
knowledge transfer, and promoting strategic succession planning.
B. If a management board opts to exercise its authority, it shall adopt a
policy for this purpose which shall address the specific operational and institutional
needs of the applicable system and institutions and provide for, at a minimum, all of
the following:
(1) A provision that participation in the program is voluntary on the part of
an employee.
(2) A definition of eligible employee with respect to program participation,
which shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(a) He is eligible for retirement as provided in R.S. 11:761 at the time that
he begins participating in the program.
(b) He has a minimum of ten years of collective service at a public
postsecondary education institution in Louisiana, whether consecutive or
nonconsecutive, without a refund of retirement contributions.
(c) He has reached the age of fifty-nine and one-half years or older.
(3) An employee participation period of not less than twelve months and not
more than thirty-six months.
(4)(a) A requirement that a written memorandum of understanding be
executed between the public postsecondary education system or institution and the
employee that specifies workload, schedule, and program expectations.
(b) A requirement that the memorandum of understanding be approved by
the institution's human resources officer, chief academic officer, and chief fiscal
officer, as applicable.
(5) A requirement that participant workload be no less than fifty percent
effort during program participation.
(6) A requirement for formal written acknowledgment by the employee of
all program terms and conditions.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 42 ENROLLED
(7) Provisions governing the reemployment following completion of
participation in the program, including a defined waiting period as established by the
policy.
(8) A prohibition on dual employment in any other position eligible for
participation in another retirement system during program participation.
C. Each management board may adopt a program policy as provided in this
Section prior to July 1, 2027, but shall not begin actual implementation of a program
prior to that date.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit a management
board, in addition to the policy provided for in this Section, from adopting guidance
or implementation measures with respect to a phased retirement program that are
consistent with the provisions of this Section and other applicable law.
Section 3. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.